Missouri, session 2026, HB1608.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.1720, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 191.1720, to read as follows:
191.1720. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri Save
Adolescents from Experimentation (SAFE) Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", the biological indication of male or female in the context of
reproductive potential or capacity, such as sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex
hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth, without
regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of gender;
(2) "Cross-sex hormones", testosterone, estrogen, or other androgens given to an
individual in amounts that are greater or more potent than would normally occur naturally in a
healthy individual of the same age and sex;
(3) "Gender", the psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural aspects of being male
or female;
(4) "Gender transition", the process in which an individual transitions from
identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to his or her biological sex to
identifying with and living as a gender different from his or her biological sex, and may
involve social, legal, or physical changes;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1608 2
(5) "Gender transition surgery", a surgical procedure performed for the purpose of
assisting an individual with a gender transition, including, but not limited to:
(a) Surgical procedures that sterilize, including, but not limited to, castration,
vasectomy, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, orchiectomy, or penectomy;
(b) Surgical procedures that artificially construct tissue with the appearance of
genitalia that differs from the individual's biological sex, including, but not limited to,
metoidioplasty, phalloplasty, or vaginoplasty; or
(c) Augmentation mammoplasty or subcutaneous mastectomy;
(6) "Health care provider", an individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise
authorized by the laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of the
practice of his or her profession;
(7) "Puberty-blocking drugs", gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogues or other
synthetic drugs used to stop luteinizing hormone secretion and follicle stimulating hormone
secretion, synthetic antiandrogen drugs to block the androgen receptor, or any other drug used
to delay or suppress pubertal development in children for the purpose of assisting an
individual with a gender transition.
3. A health care provider shall not knowingly perform a gender transition surgery on
any individual under eighteen years of age.
4. (1) A health care provider shall not knowingly prescribe or administer cross-sex
hormones or puberty-blocking drugs for the purpose of a gender transition for any individual
under eighteen years of age.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the prescription or
administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs for any individual under
eighteen years of age who was prescribed or administered such hormones or drugs prior to
August 28, 2023, for the purpose of assisting the individual with a gender transition.
[(3) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on August 28, 2027.]
5. The performance of a gender transition surgery or the prescription or
administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs to an individual under
eighteen years of age in violation of this section shall be considered unprofessional conduct
and any health care provider doing so shall have his or her license to practice revoked by the
appropriate licensing entity or disciplinary review board with competent jurisdiction in this
state.
6. (1) The prescription or administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking
drugs to an individual under eighteen years of age for the purpose of a gender transition shall
be considered grounds for a cause of action against the health care provider. The provisions
of chapter 538 shall not apply to any action brought under this subsection.

HB 1608 3
(2) An action brought pursuant to this subsection shall be brought within fifteen years
of the individual injured attaining the age of twenty-one or of the date the treatment of the
injury at issue in the action by the defendant has ceased, whichever is later.
(3) An individual bringing an action under this subsection shall be entitled to a
rebuttable presumption that the individual was harmed if the individual is infertile following
the prescription or administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs and that
the harm was a direct result of the hormones or drugs prescribed or administered by the health
care provider. Such presumption may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence.
(4) In any action brought pursuant to this subsection, a plaintiff may recover
economic and noneconomic damages and punitive damages, without limitation to the amount
and no less than five hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate. The judgment against a
defendant in an action brought pursuant to this subsection shall be in an amount of three times
the amount of any economic and noneconomic damages or punitive damages assessed. Any
award of damages in an action brought pursuant to this subsection to a prevailing plaintiff
shall include attorney's fees and court costs.
(5) An action brought pursuant to this subsection may be brought in any circuit court
of this state.
(6) No health care provider shall require a waiver of the right to bring an action
pursuant to this subsection as a condition of services. The right to bring an action by or
through an individual under the age of eighteen shall not be waived by a parent or legal
guardian.
(7) A plaintiff to an action brought under this subsection may enter into a voluntary
agreement of settlement or compromise of the action, but no agreement shall be valid until
approved by the court. No agreement allowed by the court shall include a provision regarding
the nondisclosure or confidentiality of the terms of such agreement unless such provision was
specifically requested and agreed to by the plaintiff.
(8) If requested by the plaintiff, any pleadings, attachments, or exhibits filed with the
court in any action brought pursuant to this subsection, as well as any judgments issued by the
court in such actions, shall not include the personal identifying information of the plaintiff.
Such information shall be provided in a confidential information filing sheet
contemporaneously filed with the court or entered by the court, which shall not be subject
to public inspection or availability.
7. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any speech protected by the First
Amendment of the United States Constitution.
8. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following:
(1) Services to individuals born with a medically-verifiable disorder of sex
development, including, but not limited to, an individual with external biological sex

HB 1608 4
characteristics that are irresolvably ambiguous, such as those born with 46,XX chromosomes
with virilization, 46,XY chromosomes with undervirilization, or having both ovarian and
testicular tissue;
(2) Services provided when a physician has otherwise diagnosed an individual with a
disorder of sex development and determined through genetic or biochemical testing that the
individual does not have normal sex chromosome structure, sex steroid hormone production,
or sex steroid hormone action;
(3) The treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or disorder that has been caused by
or exacerbated by the performance of gender transition surgery or the prescription or
administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs regardless of whether the
100 surgery was performed or the hormones or drugs were prescribed or administered in
101 accordance with state and federal law; or
102 (4) Any procedure undertaken because the individual suffers from a physical disorder,
103 physical injury, or physical illness that would, as certified by a physician, place the individual
104 in imminent danger of death or impairment of a major bodily function unless surgery is
105 performed.
✔